Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2011.03
Order for testimony or information of witness; request; when.

The county attorney, other prosecuting attorney, Auditor of Public Accounts, chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, chairperson of the Legislative Oversight Committee, or chairperson of a standing committee or a special legislative investigative or oversight committee of the Legislature, upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the board or committee, may request an order pursuant to section 29-2011.02 when in such person's judgment:

(1) The testimony or other information from such individual may be necessary to the public interest; and

(2) Such individual has refused or is likely to refuse to testify or provide other information on the basis of the privilege against self-incrimination.

Laws 1982, LB 525, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB539, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB681, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 69.